Tennessee, session 114, HB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-408(c), is amended by deleting
"shall annually report progress in achieving economic efficiency" and substituting "shall annually
report progress in achieving economic efficiency to the governor and".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1300
003371
- 1 -